Utah statutes.
64-13a-2.   Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the Legislature in this chapter to:
(1)  create a Division of Correctional Industries which:
(a)  is a self-supporting organization;
(b)  is profit-oriented;
(c)  generates revenue for its operations and capital investment; and
(d)  assumes responsibility for training offenders in general work habits,
work skills, and specific training skills that increase their employment
prospects when released;
(2)  provide an environment for the operation of correctional industries that
closely resembles the environment for the business operations of a private
corporate entity;
(3)  make the Division of Correctional Industries responsible for and
accountable to the Legislature and to the governor for correctional industries
programs in this state.
